Massachusetts, session 194th, S817.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 17Q the following section:-
Section 17R. (a) Any coverage offered by the commission to an active or retired
employee of the commonwealth insured under the group insurance commission shall provide
coverage at no cost for medically necessary epinephrine injectors for individuals under 18 years
of age for the appropriate weight-based dosage of epinephrine injectors.
(b) For purposes of this section, the term “epinephrine injector” shall mean an auto-
injector approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the administration of
epinephrine and a pre-filled syringe approved by the United States Food and Drug
of 6

Administration and used for the administration of epinephrine that contains a pre-measured dose
of epinephrine that is equivalent to the dosages used in an auto-injector.
(c) Coverage for epinephrine auto-injector 2-packs, under this section, shall not be
subject to any deductible, co-insurance, or co-payment that exceeds $60 per supply, regardless of
the amount or type of epinephrine needed to fill an insured person’s prescription for those 18
years of age and older.
SECTION 2. (a) Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 10L the following section:-
Section 10M. The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health
maintenance organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators
under contract to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan shall
provide coverage at no cost for medically necessary epinephrine injectors for individuals under
18 years of age for the appropriate weight-based dosage of epinephrine injectors.
(b) For purposes of this section, the term “epinephrine injector” shall mean an auto-
injector approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the administration of
epinephrine and a pre-filled syringe approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration and used for the administration of epinephrine that contains a pre-measured dose
of epinephrine that is equivalent to the dosages used in an auto-injector.
(c) Coverage for epinephrine auto-injector 2-packs, under this section, shall not be
subject to any deductible, co-insurance, or co-payment that exceeds $60 per supply, regardless of
the amount or type of epinephrine needed to fill an insured person’s prescription for those 18
years of age and older.
of 6

SECTION 3. (a) Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 47KK the following section:-
Section 47LL. Any individual policy of accident or sickness insurance issued pursuant to
this chapter shall provide coverage at no cost for medically necessary epinephrine injectors for
individuals under 18 years of age for the appropriate weight-based dosage of epinephrine
injectors.
(b) For purposes of this section, the term “epinephrine injector” shall mean an auto-
injector approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the administration of
epinephrine and a pre-filled syringe approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration and used for the administration of epinephrine that contains a pre-measured dose
of epinephrine that is equivalent to the dosages used in an auto-injector.
(c) Coverage for epinephrine auto-injector 2-packs, under this section, shall not be
subject to any deductible, co-insurance, or co-payment that exceeds $60 per supply, regardless of
the amount or type of epinephrine needed to fill an insured person’s prescription for those 18
years of age and older.
SECTION 4. (a) Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 8MM the following section:-
Section 8NN. Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual
group or hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth
shall provide coverage at no cost for medically necessary epinephrine injectors for individuals
under 18 years of age for the appropriate weight-based dosage of epinephrine injectors.
of 6

(b) For purposes of this section, the term “epinephrine injector” shall mean an auto-
injector approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the administration of
epinephrine and a pre-filled syringe approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration and used for the administration of epinephrine that contains a pre-measured dose
of epinephrine that is equivalent to the dosages used in an auto-injector.
(c) Coverage for epinephrine auto-injector 2-packs, under this section, shall not be
subject to any deductible, co-insurance, or co-payment that exceeds $60 per supply, regardless of
the amount or type of epinephrine needed to fill an insured person’s prescription for those 18
years of age and older.
SECTION 5. (a) Chapter 176B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4MM the following section:-
Section 4NN. (a) Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical
service agreement delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide coverage
at no cost for medically necessary epinephrine injectors for individuals under 18 years of age for
the appropriate weight-based dosage of epinephrine injectors.
(b) For purposes of this section, the term “epinephrine injector” shall mean an auto-
injector approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the administration of
epinephrine and a pre-filled syringe approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration and used for the administration of epinephrine that contains a pre-measured dose
of epinephrine that is equivalent to the dosages used in an auto-injector.
(c) Coverage for epinephrine auto-injector 2-packs, under this section, shall not be
subject to any deductible, co-insurance, or co-payment that exceeds $60 per supply, regardless of
of 6

the amount or type of epinephrine needed to fill an insured person’s prescription for those 18
years of age and older.
SECTION 6. (a) Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4EE the following section:-
Section 4FF. Any individual or group health maintenance contract shall provide coverage
at no cost for medically necessary epinephrine injectors for individuals under 18 years of age for
the appropriate weight-based dosage of epinephrine injectors.
(b) For purposes of this section, the term “epinephrine injector” shall mean an auto-
injector approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the administration of
epinephrine and a pre-filled syringe approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration and used for the administration of epinephrine that contains a pre-measured dose
of epinephrine that is equivalent to the dosages used in an auto-injector.
(c) Coverage for epinephrine auto-injector 2-packs, under this section, shall not be
subject to any deductible, co-insurance, or co-payment that exceeds $60 per supply, regardless of
the amount or type of epinephrine needed to fill an insured person’s prescription for those 18
years of age and older.
SECTION 7. (a) There shall be a commission within the executive office of health and
human services for the purpose of studying and making recommendations relative to the
manufacturing and pricing of dupilumab, omalizumab, and allergy immunotherapy shots,
specifically the creation of generic versions.
of 6

(b) The commission shall consist of members from the secretary of health and human
services, department of public health, center for health information and analysis, and the division
of insurance.
(c) Members of the commission shall be appointed within 30 days of this act being
effective. The commission shall meet not fewer than 6 times per calendar year.
100 (d) The commission shall submit an annual report by December 31 to the governor, the
101 clerks of the house of representatives and the senate, and the joint committee on consumer
102 protection and professional licensure. The report will be a public record.
of 6